Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska18-612
Bonds; vesting of powers.

On the approval of such bond issue by the electors, the mayor and council or board of trustees shall be vested with all the powers provided for them in sections 18-601 to 18-614, without the same having been specifically mentioned in said ordinance.

Laws 1935, Spec. Sess., c. 34, § 12, p. 199;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 18-1912;

R.S.1943, § 18-612.